fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-nehiyawew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nêhinawêw - help : # Ordinary VAI verb - full  Wolvengrey p. 395; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36

     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: ninêhinawân
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kinêhinawân
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: nêhinawêw
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: nêhinawêniwa
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: ninêhinawânân
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kinêhinawânaw, kinêhinawânânaw]
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kinêhinawânâwâw
     nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: nêhinawêwak

     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-nêhinawân
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-nêhinawân
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kî-nêhinawêw
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-nêhinawêniwa
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-nêhinawânân
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kikî-nêhinawânaw, kikî-nêhinawânânaw]
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-nêhinawânâwâw
     PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: kî-nêhinawêwak
     
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nika-nêhinawân
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kika-nêhinawân
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: ka-nêhinawêw
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-nêhinawêniwa
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nika-nêhinawânân
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kika-nêhinawânaw, kika-nêhinawânânaw]
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kika-nêhinawânâwâw
     PV/ka+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: ka-nêhinawêwak
     
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-nêhinawân
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-nêhinawân
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wî-nêhinawêw
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-nêhinawêniwa
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-nêhinawânân
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kiwî-nêhinawânaw, kiwî-nêhinawânânaw]
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-nêhinawânâwâw
     PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wî-nêhinawêwak
     
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ê-nêhinawêyân
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: ê-nêhinawêyan
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-nêhinawêt
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-nêhinawênit
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ê-nêhinawêyâhk
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: ê-nêhinawêyahk
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ê-nêhinawêyêk
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ê-nêhinawêcik
     
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ê-nêhinawêyân
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: ê-nêhinawêyan
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-nêhinawêt
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-nêhinawênit
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ê-nêhinawêyâhk
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: ê-nêhinawêyahk
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ê-nêhinawêyêk
     PV/ê+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ê-nêhinawêcik
         
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ê-kî-nêhinawêyân
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: ê-kî-nêhinawêyan
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-kî-nêhinawêt
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-kî-nêhinawênit
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ê-kî-nêhinawêyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: ê-kî-nêhinawêyahk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ê-kî-nêhinawêyêk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ê-kî-nêhinawêcik
     
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ê-wî-nêhinawêyân
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: ê-wî-nêhinawêyan
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wî-nêhinawêt
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-wî-nêhinawênit
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ê-wî-nêhinawêyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: ê-wî-nêhinawêyahk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ê-wî-nêhinawêyêk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+nêhinawêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ê-wî-nêhinawêcik
    
    
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâw] # COMM SET I
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânaw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwâw]
     
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwak] # COMM SET I-Pl
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânânak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmânawak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmâwâwak]

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmin] # COMM SET II
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêminân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêminâwâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêminân]


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmêw] # COMM SET III
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmêwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmêyiwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimâwa] # COMM SET IV
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimâwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimânâna]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimânawa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-nêhiyawêmimâwâwa]
    
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+1Sg: nêhiyawêyâni
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+2Sg: nêhiyawêyani
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+3Sg: nêhiyawêci
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nêhiyawêyici
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+1Pl: nêhiyawêyâhki
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+21Pl: [nêhiyawêyahko, nêhiyawêyahki]
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+2Pl: nêhiyawêyêko
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Cond+3Pl: nêhiyawêtwâwi
     
     


     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nêhiyawê
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+21Pl: nêhiyawêtân
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nêhiyawêk
     
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: nêhiyawêhkan
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+21Pl: nêhiyawêhkahk
     nêhiyawêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: nêhiyawêhkêk
